Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.260

Pend Oreille county.

Pend Oreille county shall consist of the territory bounded and described as follows, to wit: Beginning at the southeast corner of section thirty-six in township thirty north, range forty-two east of the Willamette Meridian; thence running north, along the east line of said township thirty north, range forty-two east of the Willamette Meridian, to the northeast corner of section one, in said township thirty; thence west to the southwest corner of section thirty-four in township thirty-one north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian; thence north, along the west line of sections thirty-four, twenty-seven and twenty-two of said township thirty-one north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian; thence north on a line from the northwest corner of section twenty-two in township thirty-one to a point on the north line of township thirty-one, midway between the northeast corner and the northwest corner of said township thirty-one, which line will be the west line of sections fifteen, ten and three of said township thirty-one, when the same are surveyed; thence to the center point on the south line of township thirty-two north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian; thence north on the north and south center line of said township thirty-two, which line will be the west line of sections thirty-four, twenty-seven, twenty-two, fifteen, ten, and three of township thirty-two when the same is surveyed, to the north line of said township thirty-two; thence to the center point on the south line of township thirty-three north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian; thence north, on the north and south center line of township thirty-three north of range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian, which line will be the west line of sections thirty-four, twenty-seven, twenty-two, fifteen, ten and three of said township thirty-three, when the same is surveyed, to the north line of said township thirty-three; thence to the center point on the south line of township thirty-four north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian; thence north on the north and south center line of said township thirty-four, which line will be the west line of sections thirty-four, twenty-seven, twenty-two, fifteen, ten and three of said township thirty-four when the same are surveyed, to the north line of said township; thence to the center point on the south line of township thirty-five north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian; thence north, on the north and south center line of township thirty-five north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian, which line will be the west line of sections thirty-four, twenty-seven, twenty-two, fifteen, ten and three of said township thirty-five when the same are surveyed to the north line of said township thirty-five; thence to the southwest corner of section thirty-four in township thirty-six north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian; thence north, along the west line of sections thirty-four, twenty-seven, twenty-two, fifteen, ten and three to the northwest corner of section three of said township thirty-six; thence west along the south line of township thirty-seven north, range forty-two, and township thirty-seven north, range forty-one east of the Willamette Meridian, to the center point on the south line of said township thirty-seven north, range forty-one east of the Willamette Meridian, which point will be the southwest corner of section thirty-four in said township thirty-seven north, range forty-one east of the Willamette Meridian, when the same are surveyed; thence north along the north and south center line of said township thirty-seven north, range forty-one east of the Willamette Meridian, which line will be the west line of sections thirty-four, twenty-seven, twenty-two, fifteen, ten and three of said township when the same are surveyed, to the north line of said township thirty-seven; thence east, along the south line of township thirty-eight north, range forty-one east of Willamette Meridian to the southeast corner of said township thirty-eight north, range forty-one east of the Willamette Meridian; thence to the southwest corner of section thirty-one in township thirty-eight north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian; thence north, along the west line of said township thirty-eight, to the northwest corner of said township thirty-eight; thence east along the north line of township thirty-eight, to the center point on the south line of township thirty-nine north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian, which point will be the southwest corner of section thirty-four of said township thirty-nine when the same are surveyed; thence north along the north and south center line of said township thirty-nine, which line will be the west line of sections thirty-four, twenty-seven, twenty-two, fifteen, ten and three of said township thirty-nine, when the same are surveyed, to the north line of said township thirty-nine; thence east along the south line of township forty north, range forty-two east, of Willamette Meridian to the southeast corner of said township forty; thence north, along the east line of said township forty, to the international boundary line; thence east along the international boundary line, to the intersection of the state line between the states of Washington and Idaho with said international boundary line; thence south along said state line, to the southeast corner of section thirty-one, township thirty north, range forty-six east of Willamette Meridian; thence due west to the southeast corner of section thirty-six, township thirty north, range forty-two east of Willamette Meridian, to the place of beginning.

[ 1911 c 28 s 1; RRS s 3950.]